sk_SK-spell/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
PFX 3239 Y 1
PFX 3239 zm zme .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 ť š .
PFX 3240 Y 1
PFX 3240 zm zme .
SFX 3241 Y 1
SFX 3241 ť 0 .
PFX 3241 Y 1
PFX 3241 zm zme .
SFX 3242 Y 1
SFX 3242 ť me .
PFX 3242 Y 1
PFX 3242 zm zme .
SFX 3243 Y 1
SFX 3243 ť te .
PFX 3243 Y 1
PFX 3243 zm zme .
SFX 3244 N 1
SFX 3244 uva úv .
SFX 3245 N 1
SFX 3245 rno ŕn .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 ka iek .
PFX 3246 Y 1
PFX 3246 zv vz .
SFX 3247 Y 1
SFX 3247 a 0 .
PFX 3247 Y 1
PFX 3247 zľ zli .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 o 0 .
PFX 3248 Y 1
PFX 3248 0 i .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 a 0 .
PFX 3249 Y 1
PFX 3249 č či .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 o 0 .
PFX 3250 Y 1
PFX 3250 č či .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 y 0 .
PFX 3251 Y 1
PFX 3251 č či .
PFX 3252 N 1
PFX 3252 č či .
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 0 ou .
PFX 3253 Y 1
PFX 3253 čes c .
SFX 3254 Y 1
SFX 3254 0 ami .
PFX 3254 Y 1
PFX 3254 čes c .
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 o ejšie .
PFX 3255 Y 1
PFX 3255 či č .
SFX 3256 Y 1
SFX 3256 o ejšie .
PFX 3256 Y 1
PFX 3256 či najč .
SFX 3257 Y 1
SFX 3257 y ejší .
PFX 3257 Y 1
PFX 3257 či č .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 y ejšieho .
PFX 3258 Y 1
PFX 3258 či č .
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 y ejšiemu .
PFX 3259 Y 1
PFX 3259 či č .
SFX 3260 Y 1
SFX 3260 y ejšom .
PFX 3260 Y 1
PFX 3260 či č .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 y ejším .
PFX 3261 Y 1
PFX 3261 či č .
SFX 3262 Y 1
SFX 3262 y ejších .
PFX 3262 Y 1
PFX 3262 či č .
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 y ejšími .
PFX 3263 Y 1
PFX 3263 či č .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 y ejšie .
PFX 3264 Y 1
PFX 3264 či č .
SFX 3265 Y 1
SFX 3265 y ejšia .
PFX 3265 Y 1
PFX 3265 či č .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 y ejšej .
PFX 3266 Y 1
PFX 3266 či č .
SFX 3267 Y 1
SFX 3267 y ejšiu .
PFX 3267 Y 1
PFX 3267 či č .
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 y ejšou .
PFX 3268 Y 1
PFX 3268 či č .
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 y ejší .
PFX 3269 Y 1
PFX 3269 či najč .
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 y ejšieho .
PFX 3270 Y 1
PFX 3270 či najč .
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 y ejšiemu .
PFX 3271 Y 1
PFX 3271 či najč .
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 y ejšom .
PFX 3272 Y 1
PFX 3272 či najč .
SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 y ejším .
PFX 3273 Y 1
PFX 3273 či najč .
SFX 3274 Y 1
SFX 3274 y ejších .
PFX 3274 Y 1
PFX 3274 či najč .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 y ejšími .
PFX 3275 Y 1
PFX 3275 či najč .
SFX 3276 Y 1
SFX 3276 y ejšie .
PFX 3276 Y 1
PFX 3276 či najč .
SFX 3277 Y 1
SFX 3277 y ejšia .
PFX 3277 Y 1
PFX 3277 či najč .
SFX 3278 Y 1
SFX 3278 y ejšej .
PFX 3278 Y 1
PFX 3278 či najč .
SFX 3279 Y 1
SFX 3279 y ejšiu .
PFX 3279 Y 1
PFX 3279 či najč .
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 y ejšou .
PFX 3280 Y 1
PFX 3280 či najč .
SFX 3281 Y 1
SFX 3281 vek m .
PFX 3281 Y 1
PFX 3281 čl ľuď .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 vek ch .
PFX 3282 Y 1
PFX 3282 čl ľuď .
PFX 3283 N 1
PFX 3283 č čoh .
PFX 3284 N 1
PFX 3284 čo čomu .
PFX 3285 N 1
PFX 3285 čo čom .
PFX 3286 N 1
PFX 3286 čo čím .
SFX 3287 N 1
SFX 3287 si musi .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 a 0 .
PFX 3288 Y 1
PFX 3288 čr čri .
SFX 3289 Y 1
SFX 3289 y 0 .
PFX 3289 Y 1
PFX 3289 ču čú .
SFX 3290 N 1
SFX 3290 ry ier .
SFX 3291 N 1
SFX 3291 arga árg .
PFX 3292 N 1
PFX 3292 čí čie .
PFX 3293 N 1
PFX 3293 čí čích .
PFX 3294 N 1
PFX 3294 čí čím .
PFX 3295 N 1
PFX 3295 čí čími .
PFX 3296 N 1
PFX 3296 čí čia .
PFX 3297 N 1
PFX 3297 čí čej .
PFX 3298 N 1
PFX 3298 čí čiu .
PFX 3299 N 1
PFX 3299 čí čou .
PFX 3300 N 1
PFX 3300 čí čieho .
PFX 3301 N 1
PFX 3301 čí čiemu .
PFX 3302 N 1
PFX 3302 čí čom .
SFX 3303 N 1
SFX 3303 ko j .
SFX 3304 Y 1
SFX 3304 ko j .
PFX 3304 Y 1
PFX 3304 0 naj .
SFX 3305 N 1
SFX 3305 eko iek .
SFX 3306 N 1
SFX 3306 ia 0 .
SFX 3307 N 1
SFX 3307 via m .
SFX 3308 N 1
SFX 3308 via ch .
SFX 3309 N 1
SFX 3309 ovia ami .
SFX 3310 N 1
SFX 3310 á aa .
SFX 3311 N 1
SFX 3311 á au .
SFX 3312 N 1
SFX 3312 á ae .
SFX 3313 N 1
SFX 3313 á aá .
SFX 3314 N 1
SFX 3314 á iev .
SFX 3315 N 1
SFX 3315 á aám .
SFX 3316 N 1
SFX 3316 á aách .
SFX 3317 N 1
SFX 3317 á aami .
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 a 0 .
PFX 3318 Y 1
PFX 3318 ša šá .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 y 0 .
PFX 3319 Y 1
PFX 3319 š ši .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 o 0 .
PFX 3320 Y 1
PFX 3320 š ši .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 ť tich .
PFX 3321 Y 1
PFX 3321 š ši .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 ť tim .
PFX 3322 Y 1
PFX 3322 š ši .
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 ť timi .
PFX 3323 Y 1
PFX 3323 š ši .
SFX 3324 Y 1
SFX 3324 ť ti .
PFX 3324 Y 1
PFX 3324 š ši .
SFX 3325 N 1
SFX 3325 ev va .
SFX 3326 N 1
SFX 3326 ev vu .
SFX 3327 N 1
SFX 3327 ev ve .
SFX 3328 N 1
SFX 3328 ev vom .
SFX 3329 N 1
SFX 3329 ev vy .
SFX 3330 N 1
SFX 3330 ev vov .
SFX 3331 N 1
SFX 3331 ev voch .
SFX 3332 Y 1
SFX 3332 a 0 .
PFX 3332 Y 1
PFX 3332 ši ší .
SFX 3333 N 1
SFX 3333 í ého .
SFX 3334 N 1
SFX 3334 í ému .
SFX 3335 N 1
SFX 3335 í á .
SFX 3336 N 1
SFX 3336 í ú .
SFX 3337 N 1
SFX 3337 umpa úmp .
SFX 3338 Y 1
SFX 3338 a 0 .
PFX 3338 Y 1
PFX 3338 šli šlí .
SFX 3339 N 1
SFX 3339 ajza ájz .
SFX 3340 N 1
SFX 3340 auba áub .
SFX 3341 N 1
SFX 3341 ňa nce .
SFX 3342 N 1
SFX 3342 ňa niec .
SFX 3343 N 1
SFX 3343 ňa ncom .
SFX 3344 N 1
SFX 3344 ňa ncoch .
SFX 3345 N 1
SFX 3345 ňa ncami .
SFX 3346 N 1
SFX 3346 vec evca .
SFX 3347 N 1
SFX 3347 vec evcovi .
SFX 3348 N 1
SFX 3348 vec evcom .
SFX 3349 N 1
SFX 3349 vec evci .
SFX 3350 N 1
SFX 3350 vec evcov .
SFX 3351 N 1
SFX 3351 vec evcoch .
SFX 3352 N 1
SFX 3352 vec evcami .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 a 0 .
PFX 3353 Y 1
PFX 3353 šľ šli .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 a 0 .
PFX 3354 Y 1
PFX 3354 šľa šľá .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 a 0 .
PFX 3355 Y 1
PFX 3355 šť šti .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 a 0 .
PFX 3356 Y 1
PFX 3356 ť ti .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 a 0 .
PFX 3357 Y 1
PFX 3357 ž ži .
SFX 3358 N 1
SFX 3358 rnda ŕnd .
SFX 3359 N 1
SFX 3359 ezo iez .
SFX 3360 N 1
SFX 3360 re er .
SFX 3361 N 1
SFX 3361 re ier .
SFX 3362 N 1
SFX 3362 en neho .
SFX 3363 N 1
SFX 3363 en nemu .
SFX 3364 N 1
SFX 3364 en nym .
SFX 3365 N 1
SFX 3365 en nych .
SFX 3366 N 1
SFX 3366 en nymi .
SFX 3367 N 1
SFX 3367 ľava liav .
SFX 3368 N 1
SFX 3368 nec enca .
SFX 3369 N 1
SFX 3369 nec encovi .
SFX 3370 N 1
SFX 3370 nec encom .
SFX 3371 N 1
SFX 3371 nec enci .
SFX 3372 N 1
SFX 3372 nec encov .
SFX 3373 N 1
SFX 3373 nec encoch .
SFX 3374 N 1
SFX 3374 nec encami .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 a 0 .
PFX 3375 Y 1
PFX 3375 žu žú .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 a 0 .
PFX 3376 Y 1
PFX 3376 žľ žli .
